Texas statutes.
PENAL CODE

TITLE 7. OFFENSES AGAINST PROPERTY

CHAPTER 30. BURGLARY AND CRIMINAL TRESPASS

Sec. 30.01. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Habitation" means a structure or vehicle that is adapted for the overnight accommodation of persons, and includes:

(A) each separately secured or occupied portion of the structure or vehicle; and

(B) each structure appurtenant to or connected with the structure or vehicle.

(2) "Building" means any enclosed structure intended for use or occupation as a habitation or for some purpose of trade, manufacture, ornament, or use.

(3) "Vehicle" includes any device in, on, or by which any person or property is or may be propelled, moved, or drawn in the normal course of commerce or transportation, except such devices as are classified as "habitation."

(4) "Controlled substance" has the meaning assigned by Section 481.002, Health and Safety Code.

(5) "Wholesale distributor of prescription drugs" means a wholesale distributor, as defined by Section 431.401, Health and Safety Code.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 338 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 30.02. BURGLARY. (a) A person commits an offense if, without the effective consent of the owner, the person:

(1) enters a habitation, or a building (or any portion of a building) not then open to the public, with intent to commit a felony, theft, or an assault; or

(2) remains concealed, with intent to commit a felony, theft, or an assault, in a building or habitation; or

(3) enters a building or habitation and commits or attempts to commit a felony, theft, or an assault.

(b) For purposes of this section, "enter" means to intrude:

(1) any part of the body; or

(2) any physical object connected with the body.

(c) Except as provided in Subsection (c-1), (c-2), or (d), an offense under this section is a:

(1) state jail felony if committed in a building other than a habitation; or

(2) felony of the second degree if committed in a habitation.

(c-1) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree if:

(1) the premises are a commercial building in which a controlled substance is generally stored, including a pharmacy, clinic, hospital, nursing facility, or warehouse; and

(2) the person entered or remained concealed in that building with intent to commit a theft of a controlled substance.

(c-2) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree if:

(1) the premises are a building other than a habitation; and

(2) it is shown on the trial of the offense that the actor committed the offense in the course of committing an offense under Section 20.05(a)(2).

(d) An offense under this section is a felony of the first degree if:

(1) the premises are a habitation; and

(2) any party to the offense entered the habitation with intent to commit a felony other than felony theft or committed or attempted to commit a felony other than felony theft.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 727, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 338 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 4), Sec. 8, eff. February 6, 2024.

Sec. 30.03. BURGLARY OF COIN-OPERATED OR COIN COLLECTION MACHINES. (a) A person commits an offense if, without the effective consent of the owner, he breaks or enters into any coin-operated machine, coin collection machine, or other coin-operated or coin collection receptacle, contrivance, apparatus, or equipment used for the purpose of providing lawful amusement, sales of goods, services, or other valuable things, or telecommunications with intent to obtain property or services.

(b) For purposes of this section, "entry" includes every kind of entry except one made with the effective consent of the owner.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994.

Sec. 30.04. BURGLARY OF VEHICLES. (a) A person commits an offense if, without the effective consent of the owner, he breaks into or enters a vehicle or any part of a vehicle with intent to commit any felony or theft.

(b) For purposes of this section, "enter" means to intrude:

(1) any part of the body; or

(2) any physical object connected with the body.

(c) For purposes of this section, a container or trailer carried on a rail car is a part of the rail car.

(d) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor, except that:

(1) the offense is a Class A misdemeanor with a minimum term of confinement of six months if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted of an offense under this section;

(2) the offense is a state jail felony if:

(A) it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of an offense under this section; or

(B) the vehicle or part of the vehicle broken into or entered is a rail car; and

(3) the offense is a felony of the third degree if:

(A) the vehicle broken into or entered is owned or operated by a wholesale distributor of prescription drugs and the actor breaks into or enters that vehicle with the intent to commit theft of a controlled substance; or

(B) it is shown on the trial of the offense that the actor committed the offense in the course of committing an offense under Section 20.05(a)(2).

(d-1) For the purposes of Subsection (d), a defendant has been previously convicted under this section if the defendant was adjudged guilty of the offense or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in return for a grant of deferred adjudication, regardless of whether the sentence for the offense was ever imposed or whether the sentence was probated and the defendant was subsequently discharged from community supervision.

(e) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the actor entered a rail car or any part of a rail car and was at that time an employee or a representative of employees exercising a right under the Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.).

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 308 (H.B. 1887), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 338 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 4), Sec. 9, eff. February 6, 2024.

Sec. 30.05. CRIMINAL TRESPASS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person enters or remains on or in property of another, including residential land, agricultural land, a recreational vehicle park, a building, a general residential operation operating as a residential treatment center, or an aircraft or other vehicle, without effective consent and the person:

(1) had notice that the entry was forbidden; or

(2) received notice to depart but failed to do so.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) "Entry" means the intrusion of the entire body.

(2) "Notice" means:

(A) oral or written communication by the owner or someone with apparent authority to act for the owner;

(B) fencing or other enclosure obviously designed to exclude intruders or to contain livestock;

(C) a sign or signs posted on the property or at the entrance to the building, reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders, indicating that entry is forbidden;

(D) the placement of identifying purple paint marks on trees or posts on the property, provided that the marks are:

(i) vertical lines of not less than eight inches in length and not less than one inch in width;

(ii) placed so that the bottom of the mark is not less than three feet from the ground or more than five feet from the ground; and

(iii) placed at locations that are readily visible to any person approaching the property and no more than:

(a) 100 feet apart on forest land; or

(b) 1,000 feet apart on land other than forest land; or

(E) the visible presence on the property of a crop grown for human consumption that is under cultivation, in the process of being harvested, or marketable if harvested at the time of entry.

(3) "Shelter center" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.002, Human Resources Code.

(4) "Forest land" means land on which the trees are potentially valuable for timber products.

(5) "Agricultural land" has the meaning assigned by Section 75.001, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(6) "Superfund site" means a facility that:

(A) is on the National Priorities List established under Section 105 of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Section 9605); or

(B) is listed on the state registry established under Section 361.181, Health and Safety Code.

(7) "Critical infrastructure facility" means one of the following, if completely enclosed by a fence or other physical barrier that is obviously designed to exclude intruders:

(A) a chemical manufacturing facility;

(B) a refinery;

(C) an electrical power generating facility, substation, switching station, electrical control center, or electrical transmission or distribution facility;

(D) a water intake structure, water treatment facility, wastewater treatment plant, or pump station;

(E) a natural gas transmission compressor station;

(F) a liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility;

(G) a telecommunications central switching office;

(H) a port, railroad switching yard, trucking terminal, or other freight transportation facility;

(I) a gas processing plant, including a plant used in the processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas; or

(J) a transmission facility used by a federally licensed radio or television station.

(8) "Protected freshwater area" has the meaning assigned by Section 90.001, Parks and Wildlife Code.

(9) "Recognized state" means another state with which the attorney general of this state, with the approval of the governor of this state, negotiated an agreement after determining that the other state:

(A) has firearm proficiency requirements for peace officers; and

(B) fully recognizes the right of peace officers commissioned in this state to carry weapons in the other state.

(10) "Recreational vehicle park" has the meaning assigned by Section 13.087, Water Code.

(11) "Residential land" means real property improved by a dwelling and zoned for or otherwise authorized for single-family or multifamily use.

(12) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(13) "General residential operation" has the meaning assigned by Section 42.002, Human Resources Code.

(c) A person may provide notice that firearms are prohibited on the property by posting a sign at each entrance to the property that:

(1) includes language that is identical to or substantially similar to the following: "Pursuant to Section 30.05, Penal Code (criminal trespass), a person may not enter this property with a firearm";

(2) includes the language described by Subdivision (1) in both English and Spanish;

(3) appears in contrasting colors with block letters at least one inch in height; and

(4) is displayed in a conspicuous manner clearly visible to the public.

(d) Subject to Subsection (d-3), an offense under this section is:

(1) a Class B misdemeanor, except as provided by Subdivisions (2), (3), and (4);

(2) a Class C misdemeanor, except as provided by Subdivisions (3) and (4), if the offense is committed:

(A) on agricultural land and within 100 feet of the boundary of the land; or

(B) on residential land and within 100 feet of a protected freshwater area;

(3) a Class A misdemeanor, except as provided by Subdivision (4), if:

(A) the offense is committed:

(i) in a habitation or a shelter center;

(ii) on a Superfund site; or

(iii) on or in a critical infrastructure facility;

(B) the offense is committed on or in property of an institution of higher education and it is shown on the trial of the offense that the person has previously been convicted of:

(i) an offense under this section relating to entering or remaining on or in property of an institution of higher education; or

(ii) an offense under Section 51.204(b)(1), Education Code, relating to trespassing on the grounds of an institution of higher education;

(C) the person carries a deadly weapon during the commission of the offense; or

(D) the offense is committed on the property of or within a general residential operation operating as a residential treatment center; and

(4) a felony of the third degree if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant committed the offense in the course of committing an offense under Section 20.05(a)(2).

(d-1) For the purposes of Subsection (d)(3)(B), a person has previously been convicted of an offense described by that paragraph if the person was adjudged guilty of the offense or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in return for a grant of deferred adjudication community supervision, regardless of whether the sentence for the offense was ever imposed or whether the sentence was probated and the person was subsequently discharged from deferred adjudication community supervision.

(d-2) At the punishment stage of a trial in which the attorney representing the state seeks the increase in punishment provided by Subsection (d)(3)(B), the defendant may raise the issue as to whether, at the time of the instant offense or the previous offense, the defendant was engaging in speech or expressive conduct protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 8, Article I, Texas Constitution. If the defendant proves the issue in the affirmative by a preponderance of the evidence, the increase in punishment provided by Subsection (d)(3)(B) does not apply.

(d-3) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200 if the person enters the property, land, or building with a firearm or other weapon and the sole basis on which entry on the property or land or in the building was forbidden is that entry with a firearm or other weapon was forbidden, except that the offense is a Class A misdemeanor if it is shown on the trial of the offense that, after entering the property, land, or building with the firearm or other weapon, the actor:

(1) personally received from the owner of the property or another person with apparent authority to act for the owner notice that entry with a firearm or other weapon was forbidden, as given through:

(A) notice under Subsection (b)(2)(A), including oral or written communication; or

(B) if the actor is unable to reasonably understand the notice described by Paragraph (A), other personal notice that is reasonable under the circumstances; and

(2) subsequently failed to depart.

(e) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the actor at the time of the offense was:

(1) a firefighter or emergency medical services personnel, as defined by Section 773.003, Health and Safety Code, acting in the lawful discharge of an official duty under exigent circumstances;

(2) a person who was:

(A) an employee or agent of:

(i) an electric utility, as defined by Section 31.002, Utilities Code;

(ii) a telecommunications provider, as defined by Section 51.002, Utilities Code;

(iii) a video service provider or cable service provider, as defined by Section 66.002, Utilities Code;

(iv) a gas utility, as defined by Section 101.003, Utilities Code, which for the purposes of this subsection includes a municipally owned utility as defined by that section;

(v) a gas utility, as defined by Section 121.001, Utilities Code;

(vi) a pipeline used for the transportation or sale of oil, gas, or related products; or

(vii) an electric cooperative or municipally owned utility, as defined by Section 11.003, Utilities Code; and

(B) performing a duty within the scope of that employment or agency; or

(3) a person who was:

(A) employed by or acting as agent for an entity that had, or that the person reasonably believed had, effective consent or authorization provided by law to enter the property; and

(B) performing a duty within the scope of that employment or agency.

(f) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the basis on which entry on the property or land or in the building was forbidden is that entry with a handgun was forbidden; and

(2) the person was carrying:

(A) a license issued under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code, to carry a handgun; and

(B) a handgun:

(i) in a concealed manner; or

(ii) in a holster.

(f-1) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the basis on which entry on the property was forbidden is that entry with a firearm or firearm ammunition was forbidden;

(2) the actor is:

(A) an owner of an apartment in a condominium regime governed by Chapter 81, Property Code;

(B) an owner of a condominium unit governed by Chapter 82, Property Code;

(C) a tenant or guest of an owner described by Paragraph (A) or (B); or

(D) a guest of a tenant of an owner described by Paragraph (A) or (B);

(3) the actor:

(A) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the condominium apartment or unit owner's apartment or unit;

(B) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the condominium apartment or unit owner's apartment or unit;

(C) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the actor's vehicle located in a parking area provided for residents or guests of the condominium property; or

(D) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the actor's vehicle located in a parking area provided for residents or guests of the condominium property; and

(4) the actor is not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing a firearm or firearm ammunition.

(f-2) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the basis on which entry on a leased premises governed by Chapter 92, Property Code, was forbidden is that entry with a firearm or firearm ammunition was forbidden;

(2) the actor is a tenant of the leased premises or the tenant's guest;

(3) the actor:

(A) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the tenant's rental unit;

(B) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the tenant's rental unit;

(C) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the actor's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or guests by the landlord of the leased premises; or

(D) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the actor's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or guests by the landlord of the leased premises; and

(4) the actor is not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing a firearm or firearm ammunition.

(f-3) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the basis on which entry on a leased premises governed by Chapter 94, Property Code, was forbidden is that entry with a firearm or firearm ammunition was forbidden;

(2) the actor is a tenant of a manufactured home lot or the tenant's guest;

(3) the actor:

(A) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the tenant's manufactured home;

(B) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the tenant's manufactured home;

(C) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the actor's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the leased premises; or

(D) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the actor's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the leased premises; and

(4) the actor is not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing a firearm or firearm ammunition.

(f-4) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the conduct occurred on hotel property, and the basis on which entry on that property was forbidden is that entry with a firearm or firearm ammunition was forbidden;

(2) the actor is a guest of a hotel, as defined by Section 2155.101, Occupations Code; and

(3) the actor:

(A) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the actor's hotel room;

(B) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the hotel or the actor's hotel room;

(C) carries a firearm or firearm ammunition directly en route to or from the actor's vehicle located on the hotel property, including a vehicle in a parking area provided for hotel guests; or

(D) carries or stores a firearm or firearm ammunition in the actor's vehicle located on the hotel property, including a vehicle in a parking area provided for hotel guests.

(g) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the actor entered a railroad switching yard or any part of a railroad switching yard and was at that time an employee or a representative of employees exercising a right under the Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.).

(h) At the punishment stage of a trial in which the attorney representing the state seeks the increase in punishment provided by Subsection (d)(3)(A)(iii), the defendant may raise the issue as to whether the defendant entered or remained on or in a critical infrastructure facility as part of a peaceful or lawful assembly, including an attempt to exercise rights guaranteed by state or federal labor laws. If the defendant proves the issue in the affirmative by a preponderance of the evidence, the increase in punishment provided by Subsection (d)(3)(A)(iii) does not apply.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(i) This section does not apply if:

(1) the basis on which entry on the property or land or in the building was forbidden is that entry with a handgun or other weapon was forbidden; and

(2) the actor at the time of the offense was a peace officer, including a commissioned peace officer of a recognized state, or a special investigator under Article 2.122, Code of Criminal Procedure, regardless of whether the peace officer or special investigator was engaged in the actual discharge of an official duty while carrying the weapon.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(i) This section does not apply if:

(1) the basis on which entry on the property or land or in the building was forbidden is that entry with a handgun or other weapon was forbidden; and

(2) the actor at the time of the offense was a peace officer, including a commissioned peace officer of a recognized state, or a special investigator under Article 2A.002, Code of Criminal Procedure, regardless of whether the peace officer or special investigator was engaged in the actual discharge of an official duty while carrying the weapon.

(j) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138, Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 883, ch. 399, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 1114, ch. 530, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 27, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2385, ch. 596, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 139, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 308, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 24, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 1.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1229, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 169, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 765, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 16.002, 21.001(94), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1078, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14B.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 2110), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1337 (S.B. 9), Sec. 20, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1337 (S.B. 9), Sec. 21, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(61), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.002(13), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (H.B. 2609), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (H.B. 2609), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (H.B. 2609), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (H.B. 2609), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 20.001, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 564 (S.B. 701), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 613 (S.B. 1268), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1302 (H.B. 3142), Sec. 12, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 40, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 602 (S.B. 1649), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 602 (S.B. 1649), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 39 (H.B. 302), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 481 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (S.B. 550), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 807 (H.B. 1540), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 807 (H.B. 1540), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 807 (H.B. 1540), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1008 (S.B. 20), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.156, eff. January 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 4), Sec. 10, eff. February 6, 2024.

Sec. 30.06. TRESPASS BY LICENSE HOLDER WITH A CONCEALED HANDGUN. (a) A license holder commits an offense if the license holder:

(1) carries a concealed handgun under the authority of Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code, on property of another without effective consent; and

(2) received notice that entry on the property by a license holder with a concealed handgun was forbidden.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person receives notice if the owner of the property or someone with apparent authority to act for the owner provides notice to the person by oral or written communication.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Entry" has the meaning assigned by Section 30.05(b).

(2) "License holder" has the meaning assigned by Section 46.03.

(3) "Written communication" means:

(A) a card or other document on which is written language identical to the following: "Pursuant to Section 30.06, Penal Code (trespass by license holder with a concealed handgun), a person licensed under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code (handgun licensing law), may not enter this property with a concealed handgun"; or

(B) a sign posted on the property that:

(i) includes the language described by Paragraph (A) in both English and Spanish;

(ii) appears in contrasting colors with block letters at least one inch in height; and

(iii) is displayed in a conspicuous manner clearly visible to the public.

(d) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200, except that the offense is a Class A misdemeanor if it is shown on the trial of the offense that, after entering the property, the license holder was personally given the notice by oral communication described by Subsection (b) and subsequently failed to depart.

(e) It is an exception to the application of this section that the property on which the license holder carries a handgun is owned or leased by a governmental entity and is not a premises or other place on which the license holder is prohibited from carrying the handgun under Section 46.03.

(e-1) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the license holder is:

(A) an owner of an apartment in a condominium regime governed by Chapter 81, Property Code;

(B) an owner of a condominium unit governed by Chapter 82, Property Code;

(C) a tenant or guest of an owner described by Paragraph (A) or (B); or

(D) a guest of a tenant of an owner described by Paragraph (A) or (B); and

(2) the license holder:

(A) carries or stores a handgun in the condominium apartment or unit owner's apartment or unit;

(B) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the condominium apartment or unit owner's apartment or unit;

(C) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for residents or guests of the condominium property; or

(D) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for residents or guests of the condominium property.

(e-2) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the license holder is a tenant of a leased premises governed by Chapter 92, Property Code, or the tenant's guest; and

(2) the license holder:

(A) carries or stores a handgun in the tenant's rental unit;

(B) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the tenant's rental unit;

(C) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or guests by the landlord of the leased premises; or

(D) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or guests by the landlord of the leased premises.

(e-3) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the license holder is a tenant of a manufactured home lot governed by Chapter 94, Property Code, or the tenant's guest; and

(2) the license holder:

(A) carries or stores a handgun in the tenant's manufactured home;

(B) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the tenant's manufactured home;

(C) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the leased premises; or

(D) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the leased premises.

(e-4) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder is a guest of a hotel, as defined by Section 2155.101, Occupations Code, and the license holder:

(1) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's hotel room;

(2) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the hotel or the license holder's hotel room;

(3) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located on the hotel property, including a vehicle in a parking area provided for hotel guests; or

(4) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located on the hotel property, including a vehicle in a parking area provided for hotel guests.

(f) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder is volunteer emergency services personnel, as defined by Section 46.01.

(f-1) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder is a first responder, as defined by Section 46.01, who:

(1) holds an unexpired certificate of completion under Section 411.1883, Government Code, at the time of engaging in the applicable conduct;

(2) was engaged in the actual discharge of the first responder's duties while carrying the handgun; and

(3) was employed or supervised by a municipality or county to which Chapter 179, Local Government Code, applies.

(g) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder was personally given notice by oral communication described by Subsection (b) and promptly departed from the property.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1261, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 9.24, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 41, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 42, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 43, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (H.B. 435), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 39 (H.B. 302), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 250 (H.B. 121), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1008 (S.B. 20), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 1069), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.002(18), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 30.07. TRESPASS BY LICENSE HOLDER WITH AN OPENLY CARRIED HANDGUN. (a) A license holder commits an offense if the license holder:

(1) openly carries a handgun under the authority of Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code, on property of another without effective consent; and

(2) received notice that entry on the property by a license holder openly carrying a handgun was forbidden.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person receives notice if the owner of the property or someone with apparent authority to act for the owner provides notice to the person by oral or written communication.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Entry" has the meaning assigned by Section 30.05(b).

(2) "License holder" has the meaning assigned by Section 46.03.

(3) "Written communication" means:

(A) a card or other document on which is written language identical to the following: "Pursuant to Section 30.07, Penal Code (trespass by license holder with an openly carried handgun), a person licensed under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code (handgun licensing law), may not enter this property with a handgun that is carried openly"; or

(B) a sign posted on the property that:

(i) includes the language described by Paragraph (A) in both English and Spanish;

(ii) appears in contrasting colors with block letters at least one inch in height; and

(iii) is displayed in a conspicuous manner clearly visible to the public at each entrance to the property.

(d) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200, except that the offense is a Class A misdemeanor if it is shown on the trial of the offense that, after entering the property, the license holder was personally given the notice by oral communication described by Subsection (b) and subsequently failed to depart.

(e) It is an exception to the application of this section that the property on which the license holder openly carries the handgun is owned or leased by a governmental entity and is not a premises or other place on which the license holder is prohibited from carrying the handgun under Section 46.03.

(e-1) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the license holder is:

(A) an owner of an apartment in a condominium regime governed by Chapter 81, Property Code;

(B) an owner of a condominium unit governed by Chapter 82, Property Code;

(C) a tenant or guest of an owner described by Paragraph (A) or (B); or

(D) a guest of a tenant of an owner described by Paragraph (A) or (B); and

(2) the license holder:

(A) carries or stores a handgun in the condominium apartment or unit owner's apartment or unit;

(B) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the condominium apartment or unit owner's apartment or unit;

(C) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for residents or guests of the condominium property; or

(D) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for residents or guests of the condominium property.

(e-2) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the license holder is a tenant of a leased premises governed by Chapter 92, Property Code, or the tenant's guest; and

(2) the license holder:

(A) carries or stores a handgun in the tenant's rental unit;

(B) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the tenant's rental unit;

(C) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or guests by the landlord of the leased premises; or

(D) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or guests by the landlord of the leased premises.

(e-3) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the license holder is a tenant of a manufactured home lot governed by Chapter 94, Property Code, or the tenant's guest; and

(2) the license holder:

(A) carries or stores a handgun in the tenant's manufactured home;

(B) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the tenant's manufactured home;

(C) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the leased premises; or

(D) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located in a parking area provided for tenants or tenants' guests by the landlord of the leased premises.

(e-4) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder is a guest of a hotel, as defined by Section 2155.101, Occupations Code, and the license holder:

(1) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's hotel room;

(2) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the hotel or the license holder's hotel room;

(3) carries a handgun directly en route to or from the license holder's vehicle located on the hotel property, including a vehicle in a parking area provided for hotel guests; or

(4) carries or stores a handgun in the license holder's vehicle located on the hotel property, including a vehicle in a parking area provided for hotel guests.

(f) It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that the handgun was carried in a holster.

(g) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder is volunteer emergency services personnel, as defined by Section 46.01.

(g-1) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder is a first responder, as defined by Section 46.01, who:

(1) holds an unexpired certificate of completion under Section 411.1883, Government Code, at the time of engaging in the applicable conduct;

(2) was engaged in the actual discharge of the first responder's duties while carrying the handgun; and

(3) was employed or supervised by a municipality or county to which Chapter 179, Local Government Code, applies.

(h) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the license holder was personally given notice by oral communication described by Subsection (b) and promptly departed from the property.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 44, eff. January 1, 2016.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (H.B. 435), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 39 (H.B. 302), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 250 (H.B. 121), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 481 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 518 (S.B. 550), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1008 (S.B. 20), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 1069), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.002(19), eff. September 1, 2023.